Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 5 Compensation and Benefits
21-5-221. Compensation differentials.

To address specific employee compensation needs not otherwise provided for in this subchapter, a state agency may pay additional compensation for current employees in specific positions or for classifications of positions assigned to a compensation plan authorized by the General Assembly for one (1) or more compensation differentials.

(1)Authorization for one (1) or more compensation differentials may be approved if the:

State agency has documented the need for a compensation differential for specified positions or classifications;

State agency submits to the Office of Personnel Management a plan of the terms and conditions for eligibility that must directly address the needs of the targeted positions or classifications for any requested compensation differential;

Cost of implementing and maintaining a compensation differential is within the state agency's existing appropriation and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the state agency; and

Compensation differential plan has been approved by the Office of Personnel Management after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Any compensation differential authorized under this section shall be renewed each fiscal year.

The cumulative total of any compensation differentials paid to an employee shall not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the employee's base salary.

(1)Hazardous duty differential of up to ten percent (10%) may be authorized for the increased risk of personal physical injury for an employee occupying a certain identified high-risk position if the:

Position classification is determined to be physically hazardous or dangerous due to location, facility, services provided, or other factors directly related to the duty assignment of the positions; and

Employee's regularly assigned work schedule exposes him or her to clear, direct, and unavoidable hazards during at least fifty percent (50%) of the work time and the employee is not compensated for the hazardous exposure.

(A)The director of the requesting state agency shall identify the facility or unit, location, and eligible positions and classifications within the facility or unit that are identified as high-risk.

The positions shall be certified by the state agency director as having been assigned to a work environment that poses an increased risk of personal injury and shall be submitted as part of the plan for payment of hazardous duty differential to the Office of Personnel Management for approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services in consultation with the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State after review and approval of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Subsequent changes to the facility or unit, location, and eligible positions or classifications within the facility or unit on file with the Office of Personnel Management shall receive prior approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services after review and approval by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

It is the intent of this subsection that hazardous duty compensation shall be at the discretion of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services and the director of the state agency and shall not be implemented using funds specifically set aside for other programs within the state agency.

An additional ten percent (10%), but not to exceed a total of twelve percent (12%), hazardous duty differential may be authorized for employees occupying positions assigned to a maximum security unit or facility if the regularly assigned work schedules expose employees at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the work time to clear, direct, and unavoidable hazards from clients, inmates, or patients who are in units or facilities that are classified as maximum security.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 13; 2013, No. 1321, § 4; 2017, No. 365, § 20; 2019, No. 910, §§
6132, 6133.

21-5-222. Salary administration grids.

(1)A state agency may request that a salary administration grid be approved for specific classifications or positions if the:

(A)Special salary rates may be authorized up to the maximum pay level authorized for the grade assigned for specific classifications only.

(1)A monthly report shall be made to the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee, describing all personnel transactions involving applications of this section.

The hiring of a new employee under this section shall not affect the salary level or salary eligibility of any existing employee within the state agency.

The Office of Personnel Management shall establish policies and procedures regarding the implementation and use of a salary administration grid with the review of the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

The salary administration grids created under this section shall be reauthorized each biennium by the State Personnel Administrator after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 13; 2017, No. 365, § 21; 2019, No. 910, § 6134.

21-5-223. Severance pay.

(1)If the agency director determines that it is necessary to implement the state workforce reduction policy due to state agency organization structure change, budgetary reductions, abolishment of positions or duties, loss of functional responsibility by the state agency, or the loss of federal funding, grants, or other special funds, the agency director, upon approval by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, may authorize the payment of funds on a regular payroll schedule as severance pay to full-time, part-time, and job sharing classified and nonclassified employees in regular positions affected by the workforce reduction on the basis of the following pro rata lump sum for completed years of service, including any formally implemented probationary period:

Over one (1) year up to five (5) years Eight hundred dollars ($800) Over five (5) years up to fifteen (15) years One thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) Over fifteen (15) years One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600)

Click to view table.

The severance payments under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be in addition to the lump-sum payments allowed under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, §21-4-201 et seq.

The severance payments under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum salary.

The agency director shall file a notice of the anticipated implementation of the workforce reduction policy and of the lump-sum severance payments to be made under the state workforce reduction policy with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

(1)If the head of an institution of higher education determines that it is necessary to implement the state workforce reduction policy due to institution organization structure change, budgetary reductions, abolishment of positions or duties, loss of functional responsibility by the institution, or the loss of federal funding, grants, or other special funds, the head of the institution, upon approval by the Director of the Division of Higher Education, may authorize the payment of funds on a regular payroll schedule as severance pay to full-time, part-time, and job sharing classified employees in regular positions affected by the workforce reduction on the basis of the following pro rata lump sum for completed years of service, including any formally implemented probationary period:

Over one (1) year up to five (5) years Eight hundred dollars ($800) Over five (5) years up to fifteen (15) years One thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) Over fifteen (15) years One thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600)

Click to view table.

The severance payments under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be in addition to the lump-sum payments allowed under the Uniform Attendance and Leave Policy Act, §21-4-201 et seq.

The severance payments under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not be construed as exceeding the maximum salary.

The head of the institution shall file a notice of the anticipated implementation of the workforce reduction policy and of the lump-sum severance payments to be made under the state workforce reduction policy with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 13; 2017, No. 599, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2310, 6135.

21-5-224. Extra help positions.

(1)A position authorized as extra help in a state agency shall be assigned an authorized classification by the agency, and any person hired in an extra help position shall meet the minimum qualifications and any other requirements set by the official class specification of the classification assigned to the position.

The rates of pay for extra help employees shall be set in accordance with and shall not exceed those provided in this subchapter, or its successor, for the appropriate classification.

Extra help employees of state agencies shall not exceed one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours per fiscal year as set out in §19-4-521.

The salary eligibility for an employee transferring or returning from an extra help position to a regular position shall be determined in the same manner as established for newly hired employees.

A former employee from a state agency, board, or commission who is rehired in an extra-help position is ineligible for benefits except holiday pay and as authorized by the Office of Personnel Management.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 13; 2011, No. 1017, § 8; 2013, No. 1321, § 5; 2017, No. 365, § 22.

21-5-225. Position pools.

(1)There is established a pool of one thousand (1,000) positions assigned to the Office of Personnel Management to be used to reclassify positions in state agencies to the proper classification and grade if the state agency does not have a vacant position available with the appropriate classification and grade.

To obtain a position from the pool, a state agency shall surrender to the pool the position being reclassified.

The Office of Personnel Management shall review all requests and may grant approval of the reclassification after review by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

(1)The Office of Personnel Management shall establish and maintain a central growth pool of two hundred (200) positions to be used to establish additional positions in state agencies of the proper classification and grade when the state agency does not have sufficient positions available with the appropriate classification and grade to meet a state agency's mandated responsibilities.

Central growth pool positions are to be used by the state agencies if the personnel service needs exceed the number of positions in a classification authorized by the General Assembly and were not anticipated at the time of the passage of the state agency's operating appropriation act.

The state agency shall provide justification to the Office of Personnel Management for the need to allocate positions from the central growth pool.

Titles shall not be assigned to the state agency from the central growth pool until specific positions are requested by the state agency, recommended by the Office of Personnel Management, and reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

(1)The Office of Personnel Management shall establish and maintain a temporary transition pool of fifty (50) positions to be used to establish additional temporary positions in state agencies of the proper classification and grade if the state agency does not have sufficient positions available with the appropriate classification and grade to address organizational transition issues such as succession planning or other changes in state agency administration.

Temporary transition pool positions are to be used by state agencies only if the personnel service needs exceed the number of positions in a classification authorized by the General Assembly and were not anticipated at the time of the passage of the state agency's operating appropriation act.

A position established under this section shall be approved for the same classification as the position occupied by the transitioning full-time employee.

No position shall be authorized to the state agency from the temporary transition pool until the specific positions are requested by the agency, recommended by the Office of Personnel Management, and reviewed by the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget Committee.

Temporary transition pool positions shall be authorized for not more than one hundred eighty (180) calendar days in a fiscal year and may not be renewed or extended.

A pool position received under this section is subject to the state agency's ability to certify funding.

(1)The Office of Personnel Management shall establish and maintain a growth pool of ten (10) positions to be used to establish additional positions by:

History.

Acts 2009, No. 688, § 13; 2011, No. 1017, § 9; 2017, No. 365, § 23.

Subchapter 3

— Supplemental Personal Services

21-5-301 — 21-5-310. [Repealed.]

21-5-401. State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program established — Legislative intent.

Create a single board to administer the program and to select and offer life and health insurance plan options under the program to participants;

Develop self-funded health plan options that enhance the ability to control premiums and utilize managed care capabilities if feasible and in the best interest of participants; and

Enable a single board to:

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 1; 1999, No. 1280, § 1; 2007, No. 1009, § 1; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2.

21-5-402. Creation of board — Members.

(A)A vacancy in a position appointed by the Governor shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, §§ 2, 3; 1997, No. 633, § 1; 1999, No. 1280, § 2; 2003, No. 1446, § 1; 2007, No. 1009, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 1; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) No. 6, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
3496, 6136.

21-5-403. Policy-making body only — Reports.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 8; 1997, No. 183, § 3; 1999, No. 1280, § 3; 2007, No. 1009, § 3; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 6137.

21-5-404. Powers, functions, and duties of board.

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board has the following powers, functions, and duties:

To explore various cost-containment measures and funding options for plan options offered under the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program for the benefit of state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees.

Beginning in the 2015 plan year, the board shall not adopt a health insurance plan option that has no deductible for participants.

The board shall recommend that an active employee in a consumer-driven health insurance plan option offered under the program establish a health savings account if the active employee is eligible to establish a health savings account under federal law;

To promote competition among vendors and create a systematic formula for measuring competitiveness of the plan options offered under the program, quality-of-care delivery, portability, and accessibility to and affordability of health care;

To prepare a comprehensive analysis of the various plan options offered under the program, including cost, quality, and access differentials as well as any other comparisons of the plan options offered under the program;

To undertake studies and to take any appropriate action that the board determines will promote the financial soundness and overall well-being of the program;

To establish and set penalties as allowed under § 21-5-415;

To develop, with the assistance of the Office of State Procurement, bid specifications and requests for proposals and to evaluate bids and proposals.

The board shall allow the office to execute all other actions relating to the purchasing procedures in contracting for consultants, third-party administrators, providers, or insurance companies on behalf of the program and all plan options offered under the program;

To evaluate responses to requests for proposals, select contractors for all services, and approve the award of contracts resulting from bids for the program and all plan options offered under the program;

To perform program and plan option design, summarize plan document approval, including without limitation lifetime limitations, copayments, deductibles, and eligibility rules;

To promote increased access to and participation in the program and the plan options offered under the program by educating state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees about the program and all plan options offered under the program, including the advantages and disadvantages of each available plan option;

To direct the office to contract with qualified vendors, as defined by the board, offering the plan options under the program as prescribed by the board without regard to § 19-11-228 or other statutes requiring competitive bidding.

Each contract shall be for a term of at least one (1) year but may be made automatically renewable from term to term in the absence of notice of termination by either party;

To obtain quality-of-care information from systems, networks, hospitals, and clinical providers to inform plan option design, plan option management, and consumer decisions.

The board shall:

Use accepted national standards for assessment of quality-of-care information provided by systems, networks, hospitals, and clinical providers; and

Be empowered to:

Determine the appropriate use of quality-of-care information and scope of system, network, hospital, and clinical provider accountability;

Request aggregate performance information for patients; and

Publicly report conclusions of quality-of-care assessment; and

One (1) retired public school employee.

The Director of the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy or his or her pharmacist designee;

The Dean of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences College of Pharmacy or his or her pharmacist designee; and

A pharmacist selected by the Arkansas Pharmacists Association;

A physician selected by the Arkansas Medical Society;

The Quality of Care Subcommittee of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board shall consist of:

Three (3) board members;

Two (2) state employees;

Two (2) public school employees;

One (1) representative from the Arkansas Foundation for Medical Care;

One (1) representative from the Arkansas Pharmacists Association;

One (1) representative from the Arkansas Center for Health Improvement;

One (1) representative from the Arkansas Medical Association;

One (1) representative from the Arkansas Osteopathic Medical Association; and

One (1) representative from the Arkansas Hospital Association.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2005, No. 1308, § 1 amended this section to specifically repeal the provisions of the section regarding the Fiscal Subcommittee of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board.

Pursuant to §1-2-207(b), subdivision (1)(C) is set out above as amended by Acts 2015, No. 1135, § 1. Subdivision (1)(C) was also amended by Acts 2015, No. 910, § 1, to read as follows: “(C) The board shall require an active employee in a consumer-driven health insurance plan option offered under the program to establish a health savings account if the active employee is eligible to establish a health savings account under federal law.”

Publisher's Notes. The former §21-5-404, concerning prohibited activities of committee members, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3104; Acts 1991, No. 867, § 3.

Amendments. The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 substituted “functions, and duties of board” for “Functions — Duties” in the section heading; redesignated former (1) as (1)(A) and added “for plan options offered … public school employee retirees” at the end; added (1)(B); substituted “the plan options offered under the program” for “programs” in (2); rewrote (3); substituted “program” for “members’ health insurance programs” in (4); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Procurement” in (6)(A); in (6)(B), deleted “However” from the beginning, substituted “third-party” for “third party,” and substituted “program and all plan options offered under the program” for “programs”; substituted “the program and all plan options offered under the program” for “all health and life insurance offerings for participants” in (7); in (8), substituted “program and plan option design” for “plan design” and “without limitation” for “but not limited to”; rewrote (9); substituted “plan options under the program as” for “benefit plans” in (10)(A); inserted “option” twice in (11)(A); rewrote (11)(B); substituted “plan options offered under the program” for “health and life plan option benefits” in the introductory language of (12); inserted “of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board” in the introductory language of (12)(A)(i), (12)(A)(ii), (12)(B)(i), (12)(B)(ii), (12)(C)(i), and (12)(C)(ii); substituted “public school” for “school district” in (12)(A)(i)(c) and (12)(C)(i)(c) ; substituted “Senior Associate Hospital Director” for “Associate Medical Director” in (12)(B)(i)(b) (2) ; and substituted “has” for “shall have” in (12)(B)(i)(d) .

The 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 added (1)(C); in (12)(A)(i)(c) , substituted “Three (3)” for “Two (2)” and added “at least one (1) of whom is employed by a rural school district; and” to the end; added (12)(A)(i)(d) ; redesignated former (12)(B)(i)(d) as (12)(B)(i)(d)(1) and (2) ; substituted “two (2) public school employees” for “one (1) public school employee” in (12)(A)(i)(d)(1) ; and substituted “A member appointed under this subdivision (12)(B)(i)(d) shall have” for “each of whom has” in (12)(B)(i)(d)(2) .

The 2015 amendment by No. 910, in (1)(C), substituted “an active employee” for “a participant” and added “if the active employee is eligible to establish a health savings account under federal law” at the end.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1135, in (1)(C), substituted “recommend that an active employee” for “require a participant” and added “if the active employee is eligible to establish a health savings account under federal law”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “Executive” preceding “Director” in (12)(B)(i)(a)(1) .

Develop uniform standards of vendor plan option funding;

Promote increased access to plan options offered under the program;

Promote access to vendors who will enhance plan option availability in rural Arkansas and in bordering states;

Use the purchasing power of the program to foster competition among vendors and providers for the plan options offered under the program.

A state agency or school district that accepts state funds intended to partially defray the cost of health and life insurance for state employees or public school employees shall:

Use those funds only for the program; and

Agree to rules of program participation as stated in the policies adopted by the board and as defined in the rules and procedures issued by the director, including without limitation timely eligibility reporting, prepayment of insurance premiums, actuarial adjustment for new enrollees, and any other requirements deemed necessary by the board;

Assure guaranteed issue;

Ensure an annual enrollment period;

Verify that a dependent is eligible for coverage under the program as determined by the board; and

Beginning in the 2015 plan year, implement a policy applicable to a participating entity to identify funds that are not required to be paid for federal taxes under the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, 26 U.S.C. § 3101 et seq., generated from health insurance pretaxed premiums only, and use the identified funds for premium assistance.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-405, concerning committee officers and proceedings, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 7; 1981, No. 749, § 3; 1981, No. 838, § 5; 1983, No. 423, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3107; Acts 1991, No. 867, § 4; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 27, § 1; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 1.

Amendments. The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 added “of board” to the end of the section heading; redesignated former (a) as (a)(1) and (2); in (a)(1), substituted “Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “executive director” and “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program” for “state and public school employees and retirees benefit programs”; substituted “program, including all plan options offered under the program, is” for “state and public school employees and retirees benefit programs are” in (a)(2); inserted “option” in (b)(1); substituted “plan options offered under the program” for “various plan options and health care models” in (b)(2); in (b)(3), deleted “those” preceding “vendors” and substituted “option” for “options”; rewrote (b)(4)(A); in (b)(4)(B), substituted “A” for “Any” and “state employees or public school employees” for “the employees of the state and public schools”; substituted “program” for “state and public school employees health benefit plans sponsored by the board” in (b)(4)(B)(i); in (b)(4)(B)(ii), inserted “program” and substituted “without limitation” for “but not limited to”; added (b)(4)(C); and substituted “Vendors of plan options offered under the program shall” for “Benefit plan vendors are required to” in (c).

The 2014 amendment inserted “in the school year in which the funding is received or in the following school year” in the introductory language of (b)(4)(C)(i).

The 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 added (b)(7) and (8); and repealed (b)(4)(C).

The 2015 amendment by No. 910 substituted “2015” for “2014” in (b)(8).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1135,in (b)(8), substituted “2015” for “2014” and inserted “generated from health insurance pretaxed premiums only.”

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” following “as defined in the” in (b)(4)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “Executive” preceding “Director” and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division” in (a)(1) and (b)(4)(B)(ii).

ALR.

Construction and Application of Federal Insurance Contributions Act, 26 U.S.C. §§ 3101 et seq. — Supreme Court Cases. 7 A.L.R. Fed. 3d Art. 4 (2016).

However, the board may recommend the removal of the director, but removal is subject to the approval of the secretary.

The director shall employ staff adequate to manage the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program within the funds appropriated for the program within the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

The director shall establish internal controls for the fiscal management of the program.

(1)The director and his or her staff shall be located in the Employee Benefits Division.

The director shall administer this subchapter and the rules and orders of the division and the board.

(1)The director may require all participating entities to appoint health insurance representatives who shall adhere to the policies adopted by the board and the rules and procedures issued by the director in managing the enrollment and premium payment processes of the state agency or school district.

The authority granted under subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section includes without limitation supervising:

Life insurance coverage;

Accident coverage;

Dental coverage;

Disability benefit programs;

Optional retirement programs;

Deferred compensation;

Cafeteria plans; and

Such other benefit plans, benefit programs, and individual and group benefit coverage that are offered from time to time to state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees.

The authority granted under subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section does not include supervising the State Employees Benefit Corporation benefit plan in effect on July 1, 1995.

In addition, the director and the board may utilize the services of healthcare consultants and actuaries if necessary as provided for through the appropriation of the division.

The Arkansas State Police Employee Health Plan is exempt from any mandatory participation required by this section.

Publisher's Notes. Former §21-5-406, concerning committee powers and duties, was repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 9. The former section was derived from Acts 1972 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 48, § 9; 1973, No. 842, § 3; 1975, No. 576, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 749, § 5; 1981, No. 838, § 7; 1983, No. 423, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3109, 12-3109.1; Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 27, § 2; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 28, § 2.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2001 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1) through (a)(3); inserted “or her” in (b)(1); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Division” in (c)(1) and (d); and added (e).

The 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 3 and 6 substituted “Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “executive director” throughout the section; redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(2)(A) and (B); substituted “is” for “shall be” in (a)(2)(B); in (a)(3), substituted “State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program” for “program” and “for the program” for “therefor”; substituted “program” for “health and life insurance plans” in (b); in (c)(2), substituted “the program, including plan options offered under the program” for “health and life insurance plans” and “program” for “health and life insurance programs”; substituted “administer this subchapter and the rules” for “be charged with the duty of administering the provisions of this subchapter and the rules, regulations” in (d); in (e)(1), substituted “shall” for “will be required to,” substituted “rules” for “regulations,” and inserted “state” preceding “agency”; inserted “health insurance” in (e)(2); rewrote (e)(3)(A) and the introductory language of (e)(3)(B); substituted “state employees, state employee retirees, public school employees, and public school employee retirees” for “members” in (e)(3)(B)(viii); in (e)(3)(C), substituted “The authority granted under subdivision (e)(3)(A) of this section does not include supervising” for “This authority shall not include” and deleted “which is” following “plan”; substituted “healthcare” for “health care” in (e)(3)(D); and substituted “is” for “shall be” in (e)(3)(E).

The 2015 amendment by No. 910, in (c)(2), substituted “Funds” for “Premiums,” inserted “and any other sources,” “drug claims,” and “benefits”.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1135, in (c)(2), substituted “Funds” for “Premiums,” inserted “and any other sources,” deleted “shall be collected one (1) month in advance and” preceding “shall be used,” and inserted “drug claims,” and “benefits”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director” for “Executive director” in the section heading; rewrote (a); substituted “director” for “Executive Director of the Employee Benefits Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” throughout (b) through (e); and deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Employee Benefits Division” in (c)(1).

Cited: Arkansas Pharmacist's Ass'n v. Arkansas State & Pub. Sch. Life and Hlth. Ins. Bd., 352 Ark. 1, 98 S.W.3d 27 (2003).

To appoint three (3) subcommittees of the board to study and research plan options offered under the program, formulary management, quality of care provided, and the financial impact of implementing the recommendations made to the board as follows:

(i)The Benefits Subcommittee of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board shall consist of:

Three (3) board members;

Two (2) state employees;

Three (3) public school employees, at least one (1) of whom is employed by a rural school district; and

The Benefits Subcommittee of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board shall review, evaluate, and investigate benefits, new benefit offerings, and annual insurance rates;

(i)The Drug Utilization and Evaluation Subcommittee of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board shall consist of:

Three (3) pharmacists as follows:

Four (4) physicians as follows:

The Dean of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences College of Medicine or his or her physician designee;

The Senior Associate Hospital Director of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences Medical Center or his or her physician designee;

The Medical Director of the Arkansas Poison and Drug Information Center or his or her physician designee; and

One (1) registered nurse who is the Dean of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences College of Nursing or his or her registered nurse designee; and

(1)One (1) state employee and two (2) public school employees, appointed by the board.

A member appointed under this subdivision (12)(B)(i)(d) shall have expertise in accounting, finance, auditing, or insurance.

The Drug Utilization and Evaluation Subcommittee of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board shall review drugs for formulary management and evaluate the financial impact of its recommendations; and

The Quality of Care Subcommittee of the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may review and recommend quality performance indicators for use, recommend baseline performance goals, recommend alignment of financial incentives to improve performance, and track improvements in delivery of care.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 4; 1999, No. 1280, § 4; 2003, No. 1446, § 2; 2005, No. 1308, § 1; 2005, No. 1937, § 1; 2007, No. 1009, § 4; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, §§ 2-4; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) No. 6, §§ 2-4; 2015, No. 910, § 1; 2015, No. 1135, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6138.

21-5-405. Additional duties of board.

(1)The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board and the Director of the Employee Benefits Division shall take a risk management approach in designing the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program.

The board shall ensure that the program, including all plan options offered under the program, is maintained on an actuarially sound basis as determined by actuarial standards established by the board.

In addition to the objectives stated in §21-5-404, the board shall:

Vendors of plan options offered under the program shall provide detailed information in order to justify rate increases or inadequate performance reporting as defined by the board.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, § 5; 1997, No. 1295, § 1; 1999, No. 1280, § 5; 2007, No. 1009, § 5; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2014, No. 293, § 12; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, §§ 5, 6; 2014 (2nd Ex. Sess.) No. 6, §§ 5, 6; 2015, No. 910, § 2; 2015, No. 1135, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 2322; 2019, No. 910, §§
6139, 6140.

21-5-406. Director — Staff.

(1)The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board shall choose the Director of the Employee Benefits Division with the approval of the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

(A)The director shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the secretary, and shall perform all duties in consultation with the secretary.

Funds collected from employers, participating employees, retirees, and any other sources for the program, including plan options offered under the program, shall be used solely to pay medical claims, drug claims, premiums, benefits, and direct administrative expenses of the program.

The director may request the removal of a health insurance representative to ensure necessary internal controls.

(A)The director has the authority to supervise the implementation and day-to-day management of the program and other employee benefits, plans, and individual and group policies made available to participants, if applicable.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1206, §§ 7, 8; 1999, No. 1280, § 6; 2001, No. 1814, §§ 1, 4; 2007, No. 1009, § 6; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 2; 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 2; 2015, No. 910, § 3; 2015, No. 1135, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 6141.